Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3701
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-3701 to 38-3707 shall be known and may be cited as the Dialysis Patient Care Technician Registration Act.

Laws 2017, LB255, § 1.